Hawaii statutes.
[§206M-23] Hydrogen implementation
coordinator. (a) The director of the Hawaii center for advanced
transportation technologies of the development corporation shall serve as the
state hydrogen implementation coordinator.

(b) The state hydrogen implementation
coordinator, under the delegated authority of the energy resources coordinator,
shall facilitate the establishment of infrastructure and policies across all
agencies of the State to promote the expansion of hydrogen-based energy in
Hawaii. [L 2015, c 98, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next